North Dakota, session 69, SB2349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Introduction of bills prepared by executive branch agencies and judicial branch -
Determination by the legislative management.
1. As used in this section, "substantial policy change" means an alteration or modification
to a statute which renders the statute significantly different or transformed.
2. On or before November first of each even - numbered year, each executive agency and
the supreme court may file with the legislative council any bill draft the agency desires
to introduce during the regular legislative session. A bill draft filed under this section
may not provide for an appropriation.
3. Upon receipt of a bill draft under subsection 2, the legislative council shall forward the
bill draft to the chairman of the legislative management.
4. On or before November twentieth of each even - numbered year, the chairman of the
legislative management shall call a meeting of the legislative management to review
each bill draft filed by an executive agency or the supreme court to determine whether
the bill draft contains a substantial policy change.
5. A bill is deemed introduced by the legislative management unless a majority of the
members present and voting determine the bill draft contains a substantial policy
change.
Page No. 1 25.1023.01000